Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2135.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Menopause and Perimenopause Workplace Protections and Accommodations Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Menopause." Natural menopause, premature ovarian insufficiency, surgical menopause and treatment-induced hypoestrogenic states."Reasonably accommodate." Providing reasonable accommodations, including more frequent or longer breaks, time off to recover from childbirth, acquisition or modification of 1234567891011121314151617 equipment, seating, temporary transfer to a less strenuous or hazardous position, job restructuring, light duty, break time and private non-bathroom space for expressing breast milk, assistance with manual labor or modified work schedules."Related medical condition." The following:(1) Lactation or the need to express breast milk for a nursing child.(2) The need to manage the effects of vasomotor symptoms."Undue hardship." An action requiring significant difficulty or expense to an employer as determined under section 4.Section 3. Accommodations.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) An employer may not:(i) Refuse to reasonably accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's condition related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or a related medical condition if the employee requests the accommodation, unless the employer can demonstrate that the accommodation would pose an undue hardship on the employer.(ii) Require an employee to take leave if another reasonable accommodation can be provided to an employee's condition related to the pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or a related medical condition.(iii) Deny employment opportunities to an employee or prospective employee if the denial is based on the refusal of the employer to reasonably accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's condition related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or a related medical condition.20260HB2135PN2760 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Fail to provide written notice, including notice conspicuously posted at an employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees, of the right to be free from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause and related medical conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations for conditions related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or related medical conditions under this section to:(A) New employees at the commencement of employment.(B) Existing employees within 120 days of the effective date of this section.(C) An employee who notifies the employer of the employee's pregnancy or menopause, within 10 days of the notification.(2) A person may not:(i) Aid, abet, incite, compel or coerce the commission of an act prohibited under this section.(ii) Obstruct or prevent a person from complying with this section or any order issued pursuant to this section.(iii) Attempt directly or indirectly to commit an act prohibited under this section.(b) Limitations.--An employer shall not be required to:(1) Create additional employment that the employer would not otherwise have created unless the employer does so or would do so for other classes of employees who need accommodation, including employees who are injured on the job or employees with disabilities.(2) Discharge an employee, transfer an employee with 20260HB2135PN2760 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 more seniority or promote an employee who is not qualified to perform the job unless the employer does so or would do so to accommodate other classes of employees who need accommodation, including employees who are injured on the job or employees with disabilities.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Affect any other provision of law relating to sex discrimination, pregnancy or menopause or to preempt, limit, diminish or otherwise affect any other law that provides greater protection or specific benefits with respect to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or related medical conditions.(2) Require an individual with a need related to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause or a related medical condition to accept an accommodation which the individual chooses not to accept.Section 4. Undue hardship.(a) Determination.--In making a determination of undue hardship, the factors that may be considered include the following:(1) The nature and cost of the accommodation.(2) The overall financial resources of the employer.(3) The overall size of the business of the employer with respect to the number of employees and the number, type and location of the business's facilities.(4) The effect on expenses and resources or the impact otherwise of the accommodation upon the operation of the employer.(b) Burden of proof.--The employer shall have the burden of 20260HB2135PN2760 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proving undue hardship.(c) Rebuttable presumption.--The fact that the employer provides or would be required to provide a similar accommodation to other classes of employees who need accommodation, including employees who are injured on the job or employees with disabilities, shall create a rebuttable presumption that the accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer.Section 5. Retaliation prohibited.An employer may not take retaliatory action or otherwise discriminate against an employee because the employee requests or receives an accommodation under this act.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2135PN2760 - 5 - 12345678910111213